XFST/EnglishNouns.xfst
######################################################################
#
# FINITE-STATE TRANSDUCER FOR ENGLISH NOUN PARSING/GENERATION:
#
######################################################################

define Con [b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|p|q|r|s|t|v|x|w|z] ;
define Vowel [a|e|i|o|u] ;

######################################################################
# BUILD LEXICAL TRANSDUCER

!Noun class sublexicons:
define RegularNouns [ {fox} | 
		      {cat} | 
                      {aardvark} | 
                      {thrush} | 
		      {finch} | 
                      {dog} | 
                      {fly} | 
                      {bay} | 
                      {fry} ] ;


define IrregSingNouns [ {goose} | {sheep} | {mouse} | {ox} ] ;

define IrregPlurNouns [ g o:e o:e s e | s h e e p | m o:i u:c s:e e:0 
		      |  [ {ox} .x. {oxen} ]  ] ;


!Morphological features: noun and number tags:

define NounTag %+N:0 ; # need to escape to use the literal + (use %)

define Sing %+Sg:%# ;  # map to literal hastag --> end of word boundary symbol

define Plural %+Pl .x. %^ s %# ;  # useful to have boundary symbols, but not necessary


!Lexical transducer (cf. Fig. 3.13 in Jurafsky and Martin/slides):
# models to morphotactics
define LexT  [ RegularNouns NounTag [ Sing | Plural ] |
               IrregSingNouns NounTag Sing |
	       IrregPlurNouns NounTag %+Pl:%#] ;  # irregular plural, so can't use Plural



!Uncomment to push LexT onto stack.
!push LexT

######################################################################
#!RULE TRANSDUCERS:

! E-insertion
# %^ = stem boundary
define eInsertion [..] -> e || [ s | z | x | s h | c h ] %^ _ s ;
 
! yReplacment

define yReplacement [ y -> i e || Con _ %^ [ s | e d ]  ] ;

! eDeletion

# don't actually need this?
define eDeletion [ e -> 0 || _ %^ Vowel ] ;

! Remove morpheme and word boundary markers.
# clean up these boundary markers
define StemBoundary %^ -> 0 ;
define WordBoundary %# -> 0 ;


!Compose rule transducers:
define RuleT eInsertion .o. yReplacement .o. eDeletion .o. StemBoundary 
		        .o. WordBoundary ;
# rule ordering matters! might feed (allow for) another rule or bleed (prevent) another rule


######################################################################
!Compose lexical and rule-transducers; push onto stack;

define MorphNounParser LexT .o. RuleT ;
!push MorphParser
